District of Columbia statutes.
44-661.03

Hospital provider fee.

(a)

Beginning October 1, 2015, and subject to § 44-661.04, the District may charge each hospital a fee based on its outpatient gross patient revenue. The fee shall be charged at a uniform rate necessary to generate the following:

(1)

An amount equal to the non-federal share of the total available spending room under the Medicaid upper payment limit for private hospitals applicable to District Fiscal Year (“DFY”) 2016 consistent with the federal approval of the authorizing Medicaid State Plan amendment; plus

(2)

An amount equal to the lesser of the non-federal share of the total available spending room under the Medicaid upper payment limit for District operated hospitals applicable to DFY 2016 consistent with the federal approval of the authorizing Medicaid State Plan amendment or United Medical Center’s Medicaid disproportionate share hospital limit as adjusted by the District in accordance with the federally approved Medicaid State Plan; plus

(3)

An amount equal to the Department’s administrative expenses as described in § 44-661.02(c)(2).

(b)

A psychiatric hospital that is an agency or a unit of the District government is exempt from the fee imposed under subsection (a) of this section, unless the exemption is adjudged to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, in which case a psychiatric hospital that is an agency or a unit of the District government shall pay the fee imposed by subsection (a) of this section.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5064, 62 DCR 10905

History